Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 18. Local System Road Program

§ 65-18-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Local System Road Program.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “local system road” means a road that is included on the county road system as designated under Section 65-7-4 that (a) is functionally classified as a local rural road in accordance with policies on geometric design of highways and streets adopted and published by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials; (b) provides access to the state aid system, the federal aid system or the designated state highway system; and (c) has an average daily traffic count of four hundred (400) vehicles or less. The term “local system road” includes all drainage related structures except bridges that are included on the National Bridge Inspection Inventory maintained by the Office of State Aid Road Construction. The term “local system road” does not include a road or highway on the designated state highway system or on the state aid road system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-5.
Establishment of Local System Road Program.

There is established a Local System Road Program which shall be administered by the State Aid Engineer for the purpose of assisting the counties of this state in the construction, reconstruction and paving of local system roads.

Routes on which projects are performed under this chapter are not eligible for inclusion on the state aid system except in accordance with the provisions of Section 65-9-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-7.
Program administered by State Aid Engineer; powers and duties of State Aid Engineer.

The Local System Road Program shall be administered by the State Aid Engineer. In administering the program, the State Aid Engineer shall have the following powers and duties:

To supervise the use of all funds made available for the purposes of this chapter for use on local system roads in the State of Mississippi;

To allocate to each county that county’s share of all monies made available under the provisions of this chapter but only when the county has complied with the provisions of this chapter and only when the county is eligible for the allocation of monies under the Local System Road Program;

To keep and compile records of all expenditures on local system roads to which money is disbursed under the provisions of this chapter, which records must be kept separate and apart from other state aid records;

To approve the construction of local system roads, including roadbeds, grades and drainage, before authorizing the release of funds under this chapter;

To establish such rules and regulations as the State Aid Engineer determines as necessary to implement the provisions of the Local System Road Program; and

To report to the Legislature, no later than January 1 of each year, on the Local System Road Program. Such report shall include what projects were approved and constructed, the number of miles constructed or improved and the cost per mile for such construction and improvement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-9.
State aid allocation to counties; local system bridge replacement and rehabilitation program allocation to counties; certification of adequate sufficiency rating for local system bridges; establishment of specific designs and standards to be followed by counties.

The State Aid Engineer shall allocate annually the amount of the state aid road allocation of a county that is requested by such county for use in the construction, reconstruction and paving of local system roads in the county if the county has met the requirements of this chapter; provided, however, that the State Aid Engineer shall not allocate more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual state aid road allocation of a county for such purposes.

The State Aid Engineer shall allocate annually the amount of the Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program allocation of a county that is requested by such county for use in the construction, reconstruction and paving of local system roads in the county if:

The State Aid Engineer has certified, pursuant to Section 65-37-7, that all the local system bridges within the county have a sufficiency rating of greater than fifty (50) or that all such bridges within the county with a sufficiency rating of fifty (50) or less are currently under contract for replacement or rehabilitation; and

The county has met the requirements of this chapter.

The State Aid Engineer shall establish specific designs and standards to be followed by such counties in the construction, reconstruction and paving of local system roads. The specific designs and standards shall be based upon policies on geometric design of local rural roads, highways and streets adopted and published by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-11.
Conditions for eligibility.

In order for a county to be eligible to utilize its Local System Bridge Replacement and Rehabilitation Program allocation or any of its state aid road funds for the Local System Road Program, a county must meet the following conditions:

The county has employed a county engineer, together with such other technical assistance as is necessary to carry out the duties of this chapter, the same as provided under the provisions of Section 65-9-15, for its state aid road system and, through its official minutes, has authorized the county engineer to perform the necessary engineering services connected with the Local System Road Program. The county engineer shall prepare the necessary plans and designs for all construction projects, including state aid projects and projects provided under this chapter. He also shall provide engineering supervision for the construction of such projects and shall approve all estimate payments made on the projects. Engineering cost for any project performed under the Local System Road Program may be paid from any funds allocated to a county under the program; however, the maximum fee paid to an engineer shall not exceed twelve percent (12%) of the final construction cost. No such cost shall be reimbursed to the county before the letting of the project; and

The county has presented a plan for the construction, reconstruction and paving of a local system road which plan has been made and approved by the county engineer of the county, showing the specific road or project to be improved, stating the condition of the existing roadbed, drainage and bridges and outlining the type of construction or reconstruction to be made and the designs and specifications therefor including the paving of the road and the sources of revenue to be used and the sources and types of material to be used thereon. The plan shall be presented to the State Aid Engineer for the initial approval of the beginning of a project to receive monies.

After the initial approval of the plan and plans as specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section has been made by the State Aid Engineer, the county shall be eligible to receive all funds made available to the county under the Local System Road Program to be used exclusively for the construction, reconstruction or paving of the local system road. The project may be done either by contract or by using county equipment and employees. It shall be according to the original plan or any amendments thereto which have been approved by the State Aid Engineer. The board may use county equipment and employees if the construction can be accomplished at a more reasonable cost than can be achieved by contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-13.
Rights-of-way.

All rights-of-way and adjustments for utilities necessary for Local System Road Program projects must be acquired or performed by the boards of supervisors in the manner provided by law for the acquisition of rights-of-way, including gift, purchase, deed, dedication and eminent domain; however, no part of the cost of such rights-of-way may be paid from Local System Road Program funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-15.
Contracts to be advertised for bidding.

Contracts for the construction of local system road projects must be advertised and let by the board of supervisors of the county in the manner required by law. Before advertising for bids, plans and specifications covering the proposed work shall be prepared by the county engineer and filed in the chancery clerk’s office of the county. Copies of the plans and specifications shall be subject to inspection during regular office hours and shall be made available to all prospective bidders upon such terms and conditions as may be required by the board and its county engineer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-18-17.
Maintenance, repair and reconstruction of local system roads.

It shall be the duty of the several boards of supervisors to properly maintain all local system roads in their respective counties after construction of any such roads under this chapter. It shall be the duty of the State Aid Engineer and his assistants to make annual maintenance inspections of completed projects, and such other periodic maintenance inspections as the State Aid Engineer shall deem necessary. If essential maintenance is not properly and regularly carried on, in the opinion of the State Aid Engineer, then notice thereof shall be given in writing to the board in default, and if such maintenance is not done and continued within sixty (60) days from date of such notice, then, and in such event, the State Aid Engineer may proceed to have done the necessary maintenance and repair work on such road and charge the same to any funds allocated to such county under the provisions of the Local System Road Program. If such failure to maintain continues, then such county shall be no longer eligible for monies under the Local System Road Program until proper maintenance is resumed by it, and notice of such withdrawal of local system road funds shall be duly given the State Treasurer; however, such ineligibility shall not affect payment under the Local System Road Program of progress or final estimates on contracts awarded before notice of such ineligibility.

Local system roads that have been hard surfaced through the use of local system road funds shall be eligible for local system road funds to provide one or more seal courses, as required. Local system roads in which the grading and drainage structures were constructed under the Local System Road Program and which have been subsequently hard surfaced by the county through the use of county funds under the supervision of the county engineer shall likewise be eligible for local system road funds to provide one or more seal courses as required, provided that the hard surfacing and underlying base were constructed in accordance with the then prevailing local system road standards and specifications. The county shall furnish the State Aid Engineer with sufficient engineering data, including borings and tests, if necessary, to substantiate the required thickness and quality of the base and surfacing. The correction of base defects and pavement breaks may be made part of the plans and contract documents for each sealing project.

Local system roads that were constructed in accordance with the then prevailing local system road standards and specifications shall be eligible for local system road funds for maintenance, repair and reconstruction, subject to the prior written approval of such work by the State Aid Engineer and subject to the work being completed in accordance with the prior written approval.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 492, § 9; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).